Maine, session 132, LD1601.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §449 is enacted to read:
§449. Stakeholder group to develop uniform interpretation of United States
Department of Agriculture's regulations and exemptions
The commissioner shall convene a stakeholder group to develop a uniform
interpretation of the United States Department of Agriculture's regulations and exemptions
to ensure the uniformity of interpretation of the regulations and exemptions by an employee
or official of the State or an employee or official of the Federal Government or of any other
governmental entity of this State authorized by the commissioner to perform inspection
functions related to agricultural products under an agreement between the commissioner
and the governmental entity.
1. Membership. The stakeholder group must consist of 16 members, and each county
must be represented by a member of the stakeholder group. Of the required members, 14
must be representatives of nonorganic farms and 2 must be representatives of farms
certified as organic by an organization accredited by the United States Department of
Agriculture. The stakeholder group must consist of the following members to be appointed
by the Governor:
A. A representative of a small farm with an annual gross income between $50,000 and
$250,000;
B. A representative of a medium-sized farm with an annual gross income between
$250,000 and $1,000,000;
C. A representative of a large farm with an annual gross income greater than
$1,000,000;
D. A pork or beef livestock farmer;
E. A dairy farmer;
F. A poultry farmer;
G. A farmer of fruits;
H. A farmer of vegetables;
I. A farmer of wild blueberries;
J. A farmer of potatoes;
K. A livestock processor;
L. A poultry processor; and
M. Four farmers representing the counties in the State not represented by the members
in paragraphs A to L.
2. Election of chair; vice-chair. At the first meeting of the stakeholder group the
members shall elect from the membership a chair and a vice-chair and shall determine their
duties.
3. Existing license holders; application of regulations and exemptions. A licensed
processor or producer, as defined in section 423, subsections 10 and 11, respectively, has
5 years to comply with any change of interpretation made by the stakeholder group of the
Page 1 - 132LR1072(01)

411 United States Department of Agriculture's regulations and exemptions pursuant to this
422 section.
Sec. 2. Report. On or before December 3, 2025, the Commissioner of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry shall submit to the Joint Standing Committee on Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry a report describing the strategies, findings and
recommendations, including any necessary legislation, of the stakeholder group under the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 7, section 449. After reviewing the report, the committee
may report out legislation relating to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
Legislature.